Tennessee, session 114, HB1496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-604, is amended by deleting the
first sentence of the section and substituting the following:
The secretary of state shall annually compile an update of the required data
listed in § 10-7-603. On or about November 15 of each year, the secretary of state shall
publish the compiled data from all agencies, excluding the personal mailing addresses
and telephone numbers of members, which are confidential and not subject to
disclosure.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1496
010826
- 1 -